Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 13. State Election Campaigns.
Sec. 15.13.110.
Filing of reports.

Each candidate, group, and nongroup entity shall make a full report in accordance with AS

15.13.040

for the period ending three days before the due date of the report and beginning on the last day covered by the most recent previous report. If the report is a first report, it must cover the period from the beginning of the campaign to the date three days before the due date of the report. If the report is a report due February 15, it must cover the period beginning on the last day covered by the most recent previous report or on the day that the campaign started, whichever is later, and ending on February 1 of that year. The report shall be filed

30 days before the election; however, this report is not required if the deadline for filing a nominating petition or declaration of candidacy is within 30 days of the election;

one week before the election;

105 days after a special election; and

February 15 for expenditures made and contributions received that were not reported previously, including, if applicable, all amounts expended from a public office expense term account established under AS

15.13.116(a)(8)

and all amounts expended from a municipal office account under AS

15.13.116(a)(9)

, or when expenditures were not made or contributions were not received during the previous year.

Each contribution that exceeds $250 and that is made within nine days of the election shall be reported to the commission by date, amount, and contributor within 24 hours of receipt by the candidate, group, campaign treasurer, or deputy campaign treasurer. Each contribution to a nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election that exceeds $250 and that is made within nine days of the election shall be reported to the commission by date, amount, and contributor within 24 hours of receipt by the nongroup entity.

All reports required by this chapter shall be filed with the commission’s central office and shall be kept open to public inspection. The commission shall keep a report filed on paper under AS

15.13.040(m)

open to public inspection by scanning the report and posting a copy of the scanned image on the commission’s Internet website within two working days after the report is filed. The commission shall prepare a summary of each report, which shall be made available to the public at cost upon request. Each summary must use uniform categories of reporting. Summaries for reports filed

electronically shall be made available within 30 days after the report is filed; and

on paper shall be made available within 30 days after each election.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

A group formed to sponsor a referendum or a recall shall report 30 days after its first filing with the lieutenant governor. Thereafter, each group shall report within 10 days after the end of each calendar quarter on the contributions received and expenditures made during the preceding calendar quarter until reports are due under (a) of this section.

During the year in which the election is scheduled, each of the following shall file the campaign disclosure reports in the manner and at the times required by this section:

a person who, under the regulations adopted by the commission to implement AS

15.13.100

, indicates an intention to become a candidate for elective state executive or legislative office;

a person who campaigns as a write-in candidate for elective state executive or legislative office at the general election; and

a group or nongroup entity that receives contributions or makes expenditures on behalf of or in opposition to a person described in (1) or (2) of this subsection, except as provided for certain independent expenditures by nongroup entities in AS

15.13.135(a)

.

An initiative committee, person, group, or nongroup entity receiving contributions exceeding $500 or making expenditures exceeding $500 in a calendar year in support of or in opposition to an initiative on the ballot in a statewide election or an initiative proposal application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

shall file a report within 10 days after the end of each calendar quarter on the contributions received and expenditures made during the preceding calendar quarter until reports are due under (a) and (b) of this section. If the report is a first report, it must cover the period beginning on the day an initiative proposal application is filed under AS

15.45.020

and ending three days before the due date of the report.

An independent expenditure report required under AS

15.13.040(e)

shall be filed with the commission not later than 10 days after an independent expenditure has been made. However, an independent expenditure that exceeds $250 and that is made within nine days of an election shall be reported to the commission not later than 24 hours after the expenditure is made.

During a campaign period, the commission may not change the manner or format in which reports required of a candidate under this chapter must be filed. In this subsection, “campaign period” means the period beginning on the date that a candidate becomes eligible to receive campaign contributions under this chapter and ending on the date that a final report for that same campaign must be filed.

Before the primary election, a candidate seeking nomination by petition under AS

15.25.140

—

15.25.200

for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, state senator, or state representative shall file the reports under (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

Once contributions from an individual, person, nongroup entity, or group to an entity that made one or more independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the previous election cycle, that is making one or more independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the current election cycle, or that the contributor knows or has reason to know is likely to make independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the current election cycle exceed $2,000 in a single year, that entity shall report that contribution, and all subsequent contributions, not later than 24 hours after receipt. For purposes of this subsection, the entity is required to certify and report the true source, and all intermediaries, if any, of the contribution as defined by AS

15.13.400

(18).

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 24 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 2 ch 49 SLA 1993; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 30 SLA 1996; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 2001; am §§ 20 — 22 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 14 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 10 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 15 ch 36 SLA 2010; am §§ 5, 6 ch 73 SLA 2010; am §§ 3, 4 ch 1 SLA 2012; am § 10 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 13 and 14, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as (g); relettered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (j).

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, deleted (f)(2), which read “a person who has filed a nominating petition under AS

15.25.140

–

15.25.200

to become a candidate at the general election for elective state executive or legislative office;” and made related changes; added (k).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, subsection (g) of this section applies “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Under § 7, ch. 1, SLA 2012, the 2012 enactment of subsection (i) of this section is retroactive to December 1, 2011.

Subsection (j) refers to
AS

15.25.140

—

15.25.200

, which were repealed by § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2.

Sec. 15.13.111.
Preservation of records.

Each person required to report under this chapter shall preserve all records necessary to substantiate information required to be reported under this chapter for a period of six years from the date of the election for which the information was required to be reported, unless the records have been submitted to the commission under (c) of this section.

Information preserved under (a) of this section must be made available for inspection by the commission.

A candidate for state elected office who was not elected or a person who has left state elected office may submit the records required to be preserved under (a) of this section to the commission electronically. Records submitted under this subsection shall be preserved by the commission for a period of six years from the date of the election for which the information was required to be reported.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 2008; am § 16 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13(a), ch. 95, SLA 2008 provides that this section “applies to records for elections on or after January 1, 2009.”

Sec. 15.13.112.
Uses of campaign contributions held by candidate or group.

Except as otherwise provided, campaign contributions held by a candidate or group may be used only to pay the expenses of the candidate or group, and the campaign expenses incurred by the candidate or group, that reasonably relate to election campaign activities, and in those cases only as authorized by this chapter.

Campaign contributions held by a candidate or group may not be

used to give a personal benefit to the candidate or to another person;

converted to personal income of the candidate;

loaned to a person;

knowingly used to pay more than the fair market value for goods or services purchased for the campaign;

used to pay a criminal fine;

used to pay civil penalties; however, campaign contributions held by a candidate or group may be used to pay a civil penalty assessed under this chapter if authorized by the commission or a court after it first determines that

the candidate, campaign treasurer, and deputy campaign treasurer did not cause or participate in the violation for which the civil penalty is imposed and exercised a reasonable level of oversight over the campaign; and

the candidate, campaign treasurer, and deputy campaign treasurer cooperated in the revelation of the violation and in its immediate correction; or

used to make contributions to another candidate or to a group; however, it is not a violation of this paragraph if, in circumstances in which a candidate or group participates in a shared campaign activity, the candidate or group participating in the activity

uses campaign contributions of the candidate or group for payment of

all of the shared campaign activity expense; or

more than the candidate’s or group’s pro rata share of the activity expense; and

receives, within seven days after payment of the expense, complete reimbursement of the amount of campaign contributions used for payments made on behalf of another candidate or group participating in the activity.

A candidate may use up to a total of $1,000 in campaign contributions in a year to pay the cost of

attending, or paying the cost for guests of the candidate to attend, an event or other function sponsored by a political party or subordinate unit of a political party;

membership in a political party, subordinate unit of a political party, or other entity within a political party, or subscription to a publication from a political party; and

co-sponsorship of an event or other function sponsored by a political party or by a subordinate unit of a political party.

History.

(§ 19 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.114.
Disposition of prohibited contributions.

A candidate, group, or nongroup entity that receives and accepts a contribution given in violation of AS

15.13.072

or

15.13.074

shall immediately, upon discovery that the contribution is prohibited, return it to the contributor. A candidate, group, or nongroup entity that receives and accepts a contribution in excess of the limitation on contributions set out in AS

15.13.070

shall immediately, upon discovery of the prohibited excess contribution, return the excess to the contributor. If the contribution or excess amount cannot be returned in the same form, the equivalent value of the contribution or excess amount shall be returned.

An anonymous contribution is forfeited to the state unless the contributor is identified within five days of its receipt. Money that forfeits to the state under this subsection shall be delivered immediately to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the general fund.

History.

(§ 19 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 23 ch 1 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.116.
Disbursement of campaign assets after election.

A candidate who, after the date of the general, special, municipal, or municipal runoff election or after the date the candidate withdraws as a candidate, whichever comes first, holds unused campaign contributions shall distribute the amount held on February 1 for a general election or within 90 days after a special election. The distribution may only be made to

pay bills incurred for expenditures reasonably related to the campaign and the winding up of the affairs of the campaign, including a victory or thank you party, thank you advertisements, and thank you gifts to campaign employees and volunteers, and to pay expenditures associated with post-election fund raising that may be needed to raise funds to pay off campaign debts;

make donations, without condition, to

a political party;

the state’s general fund;

a municipality of the state; or

the federal government;

make donations, without condition, to organizations qualified as charitable organizations under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) if the organization is not controlled by the candidate or a member of the candidate’s immediate family;

repay loans from the candidate to the candidate’s own campaign under AS

15.13.078(b)

;

repay contributions to contributors, but only if repayment of the contribution is made pro rata in approximate proportion to the contributions made using one of the following, as the candidate determines:

to all contributors;

to contributors who have contributed most recently; or

to contributors who have made larger contributions;

establish a fund for, and from that fund to pay, attorney fees or costs incurred in the prosecution or defense of an administrative or civil judicial action that directly concerns a challenge to the victory or defeat of the candidate in the election;

transfer all or a portion of the unused campaign contributions to an account for a future election campaign; a transfer under this paragraph is limited to

$50,000, if the transfer is made by a candidate for governor or lieutenant governor;

$10,000, if the transfer is made by a candidate for the state senate;

$5,000, if the transfer is made by a candidate for the state house of representatives; and

$5,000, if the transfer is made by a candidate for an office not described in (A) — (C) of this paragraph;

transfer all or a portion of the unused campaign contributions to a public office expense term account; a transfer under this paragraph is subject to the following:

the authority to transfer is limited to candidates who are elected to the state legislature;

the public office expense term account established under this paragraph may be used only for expenses associated with the candidate’s serving as a member of the legislature;

all amounts expended from the public office expense term account shall be annually accounted for under AS

15.13.110(a)(4)

;

a transfer under this paragraph is limited to $5,000 multiplied by the number of years in the term to which the candidate is elected plus any accumulated interest; and

unused campaign contributions transferred under this paragraph must be disposed of as provided in (2), (3), or (5) of this subsection at the end of the term of office immediately following the campaign for which the contributions were received; and

transfer all or a portion of the unused campaign contributions to a municipal office account; a transfer under this paragraph is subject to the following:

the authority to transfer is limited to candidates who are elected to municipal office, including a municipal school board;

the municipal office account established under this paragraph may be used only for expenses associated with the candidate’s serving as mayor or as a member of the assembly, city council, or school board;

all amounts expended from the municipal office account shall be annually accounted for under AS

15.13.110(a)(4)

;

a transfer under this paragraph is limited to $5,000; and

unused campaign contributions transferred under this paragraph must be disposed of as provided in (2), (3), or (5) of this subsection at the end of the term of office immediately following the campaign for which the contributions were received.

After a general, special, municipal, or municipal runoff election, a candidate may retain the ownership of one computer and one printer and of personal property, except money, that was acquired by and for use in the campaign. The current fair market value of the property retained, exclusive of the computer and printer, may not exceed $5,000. All other property shall be disposed of, or sold and the sale proceeds disposed of, in accordance with (a) or (c) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,

a candidate may (A) retain a bulk mailing permit that was paid for with campaign funds, and (B) use personal funds, campaign funds, or unused campaign contributions transferred to a public office expense term account under (a)(8) of this section to pay the continuing charges for the permit after the election; money used to continue the life of the permit is not considered to be a contribution under this chapter; in addition to any other use permitted under this chapter, during the candidate’s term of office, the candidate may use the bulk mailing permit for mailings associated with service in the office to which the candidate was elected; during the candidate’s term of office, if the candidate files a declaration of candidacy or the document necessary to permit the candidate to incur election-related expenses under AS

15.13.100

for the same or a different elective office, the candidate may also use the bulk mailing permit in that election campaign;

a candidate may retain campaign photographs and use the photographs for any purpose associated with service in the office to which the candidate was elected;

a candidate may retain seasonal greeting cards purchased with campaign funds; and

campaign signs prepared for an election that has already taken place have no monetary value and may be retained or disposed of at the candidate’s discretion.

Property remaining after disbursements are made under (a) — (b) of this section is forfeited to the state. Within 30 days, the candidate shall deliver the property to the Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall deposit any money received into the general fund and dispose of any other property in accordance with law.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 44 SLA 2012.]

History.

(§ 19 ch 48 SLA 1996; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 3 SLA 2002; am § 15 ch 108 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 4 ch 44 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For transfer of funds in a public office expense term account reserve required by January 1, 2013, see § 5, ch. 44, SLA 2012.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.120.
[Renumbered as AS 15.13.380.]

Sec. 15.13.122.
[Renumbered as AS 15.13.385.]

Sec. 15.13.125.
[Renumbered as AS 15.13.390.]

Sec. 15.13.130.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 28 ch 48 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 15.13.135.
Independent expenditures for or against candidates.

An independent expenditure supporting or opposing a candidate for election to public office, except an independent expenditure made by a nongroup entity with an annual operating budget of $250 or less, shall be reported in accordance with AS

15.13.040

and

15.13.100

—

15.13.110

and other requirements of this chapter.

A person who makes independent expenditures for a mass mailing, for distribution of campaign literature of any sort, for a television, radio, newspaper, or magazine advertisement, or any other communication that supports or opposes a candidate for election to public office

shall comply with AS

15.13.090

; and

shall place the following statement in the mailing, literature, advertisement, or other communication so that it is readily and easily discernible:

This NOTICE TO VOTERS is required by Alaska law. (I/we) certify that this (mailing/literature/advertisement) is not authorized, paid for, or approved by the candidate.

Click to view

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 17 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.140.
Independent expenditures for or against ballot proposition or question.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 36 SLA 2010.]

An independent expenditure for or against a ballot proposition or question

shall be reported in accordance with AS

15.13.040

and

15.13.100

—

15.13.110

and other requirements of this chapter; and

may not be made if the expenditure is prohibited by AS

15.13.145

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 19 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.145.
Money of the state and its political subdivisions.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, each of the following may not use money held by the entity to influence the outcome of the election of a candidate to a state or municipal office:

the state, its agencies, and its corporations;

the University of Alaska and its Board of Regents;

municipalities, school districts, and regional educational attendance areas, or another political subdivision of the state; and

an officer or employee of an entity identified in (1) — (3) of this subsection.

Money held by an entity identified in (a)(1) — (3) of this section may be used to influence the outcome of an election concerning a ballot proposition or question, but only if the funds have been specifically appropriated for that purpose by a state law or a municipal ordinance.

Money held by an entity identified in (a)(1) — (3) of this section may be used

to disseminate information about the time and place of an election and to hold an election;

to provide the public with nonpartisan information about a ballot proposition or question or about all the candidates seeking election to a particular public office.

When expenditure of money is authorized by (b) or (c) of this section and is used to influence the outcome of an election, the expenditures shall be reported to the commission in the same manner as an individual is required to report under AS

15.13.040

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.150.
Election educational activities not prohibited.

This chapter does not prohibit a person from engaging in educational election-related communications and activities, including

the publication of the date and location of an election;

the education of students about voting and elections;

the sponsorship of candidate debate forums open to the public;

participation in get-out-the-vote or voter registration drives that do not favor a particular candidate, political party, or political position;

the dissemination of the views of all candidates running for a particular office.

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.155.
Restrictions on earned income and honoraria.

A candidate for the state legislature, for governor, or for lieutenant governor, including an individual campaigning as a write-in candidate for the office, may not

seek or accept compensation for personal services that involves payments that are not commensurate with the services rendered taking into account the higher rates generally charged by specialists in a profession; or

accept a payment of anything of value, except for actual and necessarily incurred travel expenses, for an appearance or speech; this paragraph does not apply to the salary paid to the candidate for making an appearance or speech as part of the candidate’s normal course of employment.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a candidate for the state legislature, for governor, or for lieutenant governor, including an individual campaigning as a write-in candidate for the office, may accept a payment for an appearance or speech if the appearance or speech is not connected with the individual’s status as a state official or as a candidate.

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996)

Sec. 15.13.374.
Advisory opinion.

Any person may request an advisory opinion from the commission concerning this chapter, AS 24.45, AS

24.60.200

—

24.60.260

, or AS 39.50.

A request for an advisory opinion

must be in writing or contained in a message submitted by electronic mail;

must describe a specific transaction or activity that the requesting person is presently engaged in or intends to undertake in the future;

must include a description of all relevant facts, including the identity of the person requesting the advisory opinion; and

may not concern a hypothetical situation or the activity of a third party.

Within seven days after receiving a request satisfying the requirements of (b) of this section, the executive director of the commission shall recommend a draft advisory opinion for the commission to consider at its next meeting.

The approval of a draft advisory opinion requires the affirmative vote of four members of the commission. A draft advisory opinion failing to receive four affirmative votes of the members of the commission is disapproved.

A complaint under AS

15.13.380

may not be considered about a person involved in a transaction or activity that

was described in an advisory opinion approved under (d) of this section;

is indistinguishable from the description of an activity that was approved in an advisory opinion approved under (d) of this section; or

was undertaken after the executive director of the commission recommended a draft advisory opinion under (c) of this section and before the commission acted on the draft advisory opinion under (d) of this section, if

the draft advisory opinion would have approved the transaction or activity described; and

the commission disapproved the draft advisory opinion.

Advisory opinion requests and advisory opinions are public records subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

, except that, if a person requesting an advisory opinion requests that the person’s name be kept confidential, the person’s name shall be kept confidential and the commission shall redact the name of the requester from the request and from the advisory opinion before making the request and opinion public.

History.

(§ 16 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 11 ch 73 SLA 2013; am § 21 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (f), following “copying under AS 40.25”, added the language beginning “, except that” through the end of the subsection.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (f), substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25”.

Sec. 15.13.380.
Violations; limitations on actions.

Promptly after the final date for filing statements and reports under this chapter, the commission shall notify all persons who have become delinquent in filing them, including contributors who failed to file a statement in accordance with AS

15.13.040

, and shall make available a list of those delinquent filers for public inspection. The commission shall also report to the attorney general the names of all candidates in an election whose campaign treasurers have failed to file the reports required by this chapter.

A person who believes a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter has occurred or is occurring may file an administrative complaint with the commission within five years after the date of the alleged violation. If a member of the commission has filed the complaint, that member may not participate as a commissioner in any proceeding of the commission with respect to the complaint. The commission may consider a complaint on an expedited basis or a regular basis.

The complainant or the respondent to the complaint may request in writing that the commission expedite consideration of the complaint. A request for expedited consideration must be accompanied by evidence to support expedited consideration and be served on the opposing party. The commission shall grant or deny the request within two days after receiving it. In deciding whether to expedite consideration, the commission shall consider such factors as whether the alleged violation, if not immediately restrained, could materially affect the outcome of an election or other impending event; whether the alleged violation could cause irreparable harm that penalties could not adequately remedy; and whether there is reasonable cause to believe that a violation has occurred or will occur. Notwithstanding the absence of a request to expedite consideration, the commission may independently expedite consideration of the complaint if the commission finds that the standards for expedited consideration set out in this subsection have been met.

If the commission expedites consideration, the commission shall hold a hearing on the complaint within two days after granting expedited consideration. Not later than one day after affording the respondent notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commission shall

enter an emergency order requiring the violation to be ceased or to be remedied and assess civil penalties under AS

15.13.390

if the commission finds that the respondent has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter;

enter an emergency order dismissing the complaint if the commission finds that the respondent has not or is not about to engage in an act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter; or

remand the complaint to the executive director of the commission for consideration by the commission on a regular rather than an expedited basis.

If the commission accepts the complaint for consideration on a regular rather than an expedited basis, the commission shall notify the respondent within seven days after receiving the complaint and shall investigate the complaint. The respondent may answer the complaint by filing a written response with the commission within 15 days after the commission notifies the respondent of the complaint. The commission may grant the respondent additional time to respond to the complaint only for good cause. The commission shall hold a hearing on the complaint not later than 45 days after the respondent’s written response is due. Not later than 10 days after the hearing, the commission shall issue its order. If the commission finds that the respondent has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, the commission shall enter an order requiring the violation to be ceased or to be remedied and shall assess civil penalties under AS

15.13.390

.

If the complaint involves a challenge to the constitutionality of a statute or regulation, necessary witnesses that are not subject to the commission’s subpoena authority, or other issues outside the commission’s authority, the commission may request the attorney general to file a complaint in superior court alleging a violation of this chapter. The commission may request the attorney general to file a complaint in superior court to remedy the violation of a commission order.

A commission order under (d) or (e) of this section may be appealed to the superior court by either the complainant or respondent within 30 days in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

If the commission does not complete action on an administrative complaint within 90 days after the complaint was filed, the complainant may file a complaint in superior court alleging a violation of this chapter by a respondent as described in the administrative complaint filed with the commission. The complainant shall provide copies of the complaint filed in the superior court to the commission and the attorney general. This subsection does not create a private cause of action against the commission; against the commission’s members, officers, or employees; or against the state.

If a person who was a successful candidate or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of a person who was a successful candidate is convicted of a violation of this chapter, after the candidate is sworn into office, proceedings shall be held and appropriate action taken in accordance with

art. II, sec. 12, Constitution of the State of Alaska, if the successful candidate is a member of the state legislature;

art. II, sec. 20, Constitution of the State of Alaska, if the successful candidate is governor or lieutenant governor;

the provisions of the call for the constitutional convention, if the successful candidate is a constitutional convention delegate;

art. IV, sec. 10, Constitution of the State of Alaska, if the successful candidate is a judge.

Information developed by the commission under (b) — (e) of this section shall be considered during a proceeding under (i) of this section.

If, after a successful candidate is sworn into office, the successful candidate or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of the person who was a successful candidate is charged with a violation of this chapter, the case shall be promptly tried and accorded a preferred position for purposes of argument and decision so as to ensure a speedy disposition of the matter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 25 ch 189 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 6 ch 134 SLA 1982; am §§ 33 — 36 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 26 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 20, 21, 28 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 1 TSSLA 2002; am § 17 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

15.13.120

. Renumbered in 2000, at which time, “ AS

15.13.390

” was substituted for “ AS

15.13.125

” in subsection (d) in order to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS

15.13.125

.

Cross references. —

For criminal penalties for violations of this chapter, see
AS 15.56.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13(b), ch. 95, SLA 2008, provides that the 2008 amendment of (b) of this section “applies to administration complaints alleging violations of AS 15.13 or the regulations adopted under that chapter that occurred

“(1) within one year before January 1, 2009; or

“(2) on or after January 1, 2009.”

Sec. 15.13.385.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general is legal counsel for the commission. The attorney general shall advise the commission in legal matters arising in the discharge of its duties and represent the commission in actions to which it is a party. If, in the opinion of the commission, the public interest warrants, the commission may request the chief justice of the supreme court to appoint a special prosecutor to represent the commission in a proceeding involving an alleged violation of this chapter and to prosecute that violation.

When the public interest warrants, the commission may employ temporary legal counsel from time to time in matters in which the commission is involved.

History.

(§ 26 ch 189 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

15.13.122

. Renumbered in 2000.